Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.100

Investment in corporations—Subsidiaries.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, a state trust company may invest in corporations, limited liability companies, and other entities, and may acquire or establish a *subsidiary to conduct any activity that may lawfully be conducted through the form of organization chosen for the *subsidiary, in accordance with that which is permissible for state banks under RCW 30A.04.125 and 30A.04.127.

[ 2014 c 37 s 312.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30B.04.005 was amended by 2019 c 389 s 2, deleting the definition of "subsidiary."